Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2382.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Temporary Budget Continuity Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Fiscal year." The 12-month period beginning on July 1 and ending on June 30 of the following year.Section 3. Authorization for temporary expenditures.(a) Authority to expend funds.--If, by the first day of a fiscal year, the General Assembly has not enacted a general appropriation act for that fiscal year, the State Treasurer shall, until enactment of a general appropriation act for the 123456789101112131415161718 current fiscal year, pay money out of the State Treasury upon warrant issued by the proper officer for any item that was appropriated in the general appropriation act for the prior fiscal year.(b) Limitation on expenditures.--Payments under subsection (a) shall not exceed 85% of the amount appropriated for the corresponding item in the general appropriation act for the prior fiscal year.(c) Offset against future appropriations.--Upon enactment of a general appropriation act for the current fiscal year, the amounts paid under this section shall be deducted from the amounts appropriated for the same line items or purposes in the general appropriation act.Section 4. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize expenditures in excess of revenues available or to supersede any provision of Federal or State law requiring legislative appropriation for specific funds or programs.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2382PN3184 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920